pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Festas e comemorações > Artigos para festas: Cartões de conselhos; Kits de balões; Bexigas; Banners; Velas de aniversário; Capas para cadeiras; Decorações de coquetéis; Confetes; Pompons decorativos; Jogos de bebidas; Canudos e mexedores de bebida; Selos de envelope; Programas de eventos; Fogos de artifício e traques; Enfeites infláveis para festas; Convites; Matracas e línguas de sogra; Lembrancinhas de festa; Jogos de festa; Chapéus de festa; Cortinas e fitas para festas; Kits de acessórios para festas; Piñatas; Porta-cartões; Cartões marcadores de mesa; Cartões de resposta; Sparklers; Caixas e porta-cartões para ocasiões especiais; Spray serpentina
es: Arte y ocio > Fiestas y celebraciones > Productos para fiestas: Tarjetas de consejos; Kits de globos; Globos; Pancartas; Velas de cumpleaños; Lazos para sillas; Decoraciones para cócteles; Confeti; Pompones decorativos; Juegos para beber; Pajitas y agitadores; Sellos, lacres y pegatinas; Programas de eventos; Petardos y fuegos artificiales; Decoraciones hinchables para fiestas; Invitaciones; Matasuegras y petardos; Artículos para fiestas; Juegos para fiestas; Sombreros para fiestas; Cortinillas y guirnaldas; Kits para fiestas; Piñatas; Soportes de tarjetas de colocación de invitados; Tarjetas de ubicación; Tarjetas de confirmación; Bengalas; Cajas y soportes para ocasiones especiales; Aerosoles de serpentinas
sv: Konst och underhållning > Fest och firande > Festtillbehör: Rådgivningskort; Ballongkit; Ballonger; Banderoller; Tårtljus; Stolsdekorationer; Drinkdekorationer; Konfetti; Dekorationspompom; Dryckesspel; Sugrör och omrörare; Sigill till kuvert; Programblad; Fyrverkeripjäser och smällare; Uppblåsbara festdekorationer; Inbjudningskort; Tutor och flärpor; Presenter till festdeltagare; Festlekar; Festhattar; Serpentiner och draperier; Partytillbehörssatser; Piñatas; Placeringskorthållare; Placeringskort; Svarskort; Tomtebloss; Etuier och hållare för högtidskort; Silly string
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Večierky a oslavy > Potreby na večierok: Pohľadnice so želaním; Balónikové súpravy; Balóniky; Bannery; Narodeninové sviečky; Šerpy na stoličky; Dekorácie kokteilovej párty; Konfety; Ozdobné brmbolce; Hry spojené s pitím alkoholu; Slamky na pitie a miešanie; Pečate na obálky; Programy podujatí; Ohňostroje a petardy; Nafukovacie výzdoba na večierky; Pozvánky; Párty klaksóny a frkačky; Párty darčeky; Párty hry; Párty klobúky; Párty stuhy a závesy; Súpravy párty potrieb; Piňaty; Držiaky menoviek; Menovky; Pohľadnice s odpoveďou; Prskavky; Škatuľky a držiaky kariet na špeciálne príležitosti; String sprej
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Πάρτι & γιορτή > Προμήθειες για πάρτι: Συμβουλευτικές κάρτες; Κιτ μπαλονιών; Μπαλόνια; Σημαιάκια; Κεράκια γενεθλίων; Κορδέλες για καρέκλες; Διακοσμήσεις κοκτέιλ; Κομφετί; Διακοσμητικά πον πον; Παιχνίδια για ποτό; Καλαμάκια & αναδευτήρες Ποτών; Σφραγίδες φακέλων; Προγράμματα εκδηλώσεων; Πυροτεχνήματα & κροτίδες; Φουσκωτά διακοσμητικά για πάρτι; Προσκλήσεις; Καραμούζες & σφυρίχτρες για πάρτι; Δώρα για πάρτι; Παιχνίδια για πάρτι; Καπέλα για πάρτι; Κορδέλες και κουρτίνες για πάρτι; Κιτ προμηθειών για πάρτι; Πινιάτες; Κάτοχοι καρτών θέσης; Κάρτες θέσης; Κάρτες απόκρισης; Βεγγαλικά; Κουτιά και θήκες για κάρτες ειδικής περίστασης; Σπρέι κορδέλας
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 파티/축하 행사 > 파티용품: 조언 카드; 풍선 키트; 풍선; 현수막; 생일 초; 의자 띠; 칵테일 장식; 색종이 조각; 폼폼 장식; 음주 게임; 음료 빨대/스틱; 봉투 씰; 행사 순서지; 불꽃놀이/폭죽; 공기주입식 파티 장식; 초대장; 파티용 소음 도구/피리; 파티 답례품; 파티 게임; 파티 모자; 파티용 장식 테이프/커튼; 파티용품 키트; 피냐타; 좌석 카드 꽂이; 좌석 카드; 회신 카드; 스파클러; 경조사 카드 보관함; 줄스프레이
en: Arts & Entertainment > Party & Celebration > Party Supplies: Advice Cards; Balloon Kits; Balloons; Banners; Birthday Candles; Chair Sashes; Cocktail Decorations; Confetti; Decorative Pom-Poms; Drinking Games; Drinking Straws & Stirrers; Envelope Seals; Event Programs; Fireworks & Firecrackers; Inflatable Party Decorations; Invitations; Noisemakers & Party Blowers; Party Favors; Party Games; Party Hats; Party Streamers & Curtains; Party Supply Kits; Piñatas; Place Card Holders; Place Cards; Response Cards; Sparklers; Special Occasion Card Boxes & Holders; Spray String
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Feestelijke gelegenheden > Feestartikelen: Wens- en advieskaartjes; Ballonnensets; Ballonnen; Spandoeken; Verjaardagskaarsen; Stoelstrikken; Cocktailversieringen; Confetti; Decoratieve pompons; Drinkspellen; Drinkrietjes en roerlepels; Sluitzegels; Evenementenprogramma's; Vuurwerk en rotjes; Opblaasbare feestdecoraties; Uitnodigingen; Ratels en roltongen; Feestattenties; Feestspellen; Feesthoedjes; Slingers en feestgordijnen; Feestbenodighedensets; Piñata's; Houders voor tafelschikkingskaartjes; Plaatskaarten; Antwoordkaarten; Sterretjes; Dozen en houders voor speciale kaarten; Slingers in spuitbus
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Вечеринки и праздники > Товары для вечеринок: Карточки для советов и пожеланий; Наборы для декораций из воздушных шаров; Воздушные шары; Праздничные растяжки; Свечи для тортов; Украшения для спинки стульев; Украшения для коктейлей; Конфетти; Декоративные помпоны; Игры с выпивкой; Трубочки и палочки-мешалки для напитков; Наклейки для запечатывания конвертов; Программы мероприятий; Фейерверки и петарды; Надувные декорации для вечеринок; Приглашения; Трещотки и дуделки; Подарки-сувениры для гостей; Игры для вечеринок; Праздничные колпаки; Серпантин и праздничные занавесы; Наборы для вечеринок; Пиньяты; Держатели для карточек для рассадки гостей; Карточки для рассадки гостей; Карточки для ответов на приглашения; Бенгальские огни; Коробки, ящики и держатели для поздравительных открыток; Спрей-серпантин
fr: Arts et loisirs > Fêtes et soirées > Articles de fête: Cartes de conseils; Kits de ballons; Ballons; Banderoles; Bougies d’anniversaire; Décorations de chaises; Décorations pour cocktails; Confettis; Pompons décoratifs; Jeux à boire; Pailles et agitateurs à cocktail; Cachets d’enveloppe; Programmes d’événements; Feux d’artifice et pétards; Décorations de fête gonflables; Invitations; Sifflets et langues de belle-mère; Petits cadeaux de fête; Jeux de fête; Chapeaux de fête; Banderoles et rideaux de fête; Kits d’articles de fête; Piñatas; Porte-noms; Marque-places; Cartes de réponse; Cierges magiques; Urnes pour occasions spéciales; Bombes fil serpentin
da: Kunst og underholdning > Fest og fejring > Festartikler: Kort til gode råd; Ballonsæt; Balloner; Bannere; Fødselsdagslys; Stoledekorationer; Cocktaildekorationer; Konfetti; Papirpomponer; Drikkespil; Sugerør og rørepinde; Konvolutsegl; Programmer til arrangementer; Fyrværkeri; Oppustelig festudsmykning; Invitationer; Truthorn; Værtindegave; Festspil; Festhatte; Serpentiner og foliegardiner; Sæt med festtilbehør; Piñataer; Bordkortholdere; Bordkort; Svarkort; Stjernekastere; Kortæsker og -holdere; Spraykonfetti
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Festas e celebrações > Artigos para festas: Cartões com conselhos; Kits de balões; Balões; Cartazes; Velas de aniversário; Faixas de cadeiras; Decorações de cocktail; Confetti; Pompons decorativos; Jogos de beber; Palhinhas e misturadores de bebidas; Selos de envelope; Programas de eventos; Fogo de artifício e estalinhos; Decorações de festa insufláveis; Convites; Cornetas e língua da sogra festivos; Brindes festivos; Jogos de festa; Chapéus de festa; Fitas e cortinas de festa; Kits de artigos de festa; Pinhatas; Suportes de cartões de lugar; Cartões de lugar; Cartões de resposta; Velas sparklers; Suportes e caixas de cartão para ocasiões especiais; Spray String
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Zabava i proslava > Potrepštine za zabavu: Kartice sa savjetima; Kompleti balona; Baloni; Transparenti; Rođendanske svjećice; Pojasevi za stolice; Dekoracije za koktele; Konfeti; Ukrasni pomponi; Igre ispijanja; Slamke i miješalice za pića; Pečati za omotnice; Programi događanja; Vatromet i petarde; Ukrasi za zabave na napuhavanje; Pozivnice; Trubice i puhalice za zabave; Pokloni za goste; Igre za zabave; Šeširi za zabave; Zavjese i trakaste zavjese za zabave; Kompleti potrepština za zabavu; Pinjate; Držači oznaka s imenom; Oznake s imenom; Kartice za potvrdu dolaska; Prskalice; Kutije i držači kartica za posebne prigode; Traka u spreju
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Party & Feiern > Partyzubehör: Spruchkarten; Ballon-Sets; Luftballons; Banner; Geburtstagskerzen; Stuhlbezüge; Cocktaildekorationen; Konfetti; Dekorative Pompons; Trinkspiele; Trinkhalme & Rührer; Briefsiegel; Eventprogramme; Feuerwerkskörper; Aufblasbare Partydeko; Einladungskarten; Tröten, Luftrüssel & Krachmacher; Partyartikel; Partyspiele; Partyhüte; Partygirlanden & -vorhänge; Partyzubehörsets; Piñatas; Platzkartenhalter; Platzkarten; Antwortkarten; Wunderkerzen; Halter für Karten zu besonderen Anlässen; Luftschlangenspray
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > パーティー・お祝い > パーティーグッズ: アドバイスカード; 風船・バルーンセット; 風船・バルーン; パーティーバナー; バースデーキャンドル; チェアサッシュ; カクテルデコレーション; 紙吹雪; 装飾用ポンポン; ドリンクゲーム; ストロー・マドラー; 封印シール; イベントプログラム; 花火・爆竹; パーティ用エアディスプレイ; 招待状; クラッカー・吹き戻し; パーティー用プチギフト; パーティーゲーム; パーティーハット; パーティーストリーマー・カーテン; パーティー用品キット; くす玉・ピニャータ; 座席カードホルダー; 座席カード; 返信カード; 線香花火; 記念日カードホルダー; パーティースプレー
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Buli és ünneplés > Bulikellékek: Tanácsadó kártyák; Léggömbkészletek; Léggömbök; Plakátok; Születésnapi gyertyák; Székszalagok; Koktéldekorációk; Konfetti; Dekoratív pom-pomok; Ivójátékok; Ivószívószálak és keverők; Borítékpecsétek; Rendezvényprogramok; Tűzijátékok és petárdák; Felfújható bulidekorációk; Meghívók; Zajkeltők és partifúvók; Buliajándékok; Bulijátékok; Bulikalapok; Buliszalagok és -függönyök; Buli-kellék-készletek; Piñaták; Helykártyatartók; Helykártyák; Válaszkártyák; Csillagszórók; Különlegesalkalom-kártyadobozok és -tartók; Spray szálak
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Tiệc và tổ chức tiệc > Đồ dùng cho tiệc tùng: Thẻ dặn dò; Bộ bóng bay; Bóng bay; Dải băng trang trí/ khẩu hiệu; Nến sinh nhật; Đồ trang trí ghề ngồi; Đồ trang trí cocktail; Hoa giấy; Quả cầu bông trang trí; Trò chơi uống rượu; Ống hút và que khuấy đồ uống; Dấu dán phong bì; Chương trình sự kiện; Pháo hoa và pháo nổ; Vật trang trí tiệc nhà hơi; Thiệp mời; Dụng cụ âm thanh & Kèn tiệc tùng; Quà tặng khách dự tiệc; Trò chơi nhóm trong các bữa tiệc; Mũ/nón tiệc; Băng rôn và rèm cửa dùng cho bữa tiệc; Bộ dụng cụ chuẩn bị tiệc; Piñata; Kệ đỡ thẻ tên xếp chỗ ngồi; Thẻ xếp chỗ; Thiệp phản hồi; Pháo phát sáng; Hộp và khay đựng thiệp vào dịp đặc biệt; Bình phun dây
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Парти и празненства > Парти консумативи: Карти със съвети; Комплекти с балони; Балони; Банери; Свещи за рожден ден; Декорации за столове; Коктейлни декорации; Конфети; Декоративни помпони; Игри за пиене; Сламки и бъркалки за пиене; Печати за пликове; Програми за събития; Фойерверки и пиратки; Надуваеми парти декорации; Покани; Парти свирки и тромпети; Парти сувенири; Парти игри; Парти шапки; Парти гирлянди и завеси; Комплекти за партита; Пинята; Поставки на карти за място; Карти за място; Карти за отговор; Бенгалски огън; Кутии и поставки за картички за специални поводи; Парти спрей силиконова лента
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > ปาร์ตี้และการเฉลิมฉลอง > อุปกรณ์สำหรับงานปาร์ตี้: การ์ดให้คำแนะนำ; ชุดบอลลูน; บอลลูน; แบนเนอร์; เทียนวันเกิด; สายตกแต่งเก้าอี้; ที่ประดับค็อกเทล; เศษกระดาษสีที่ใช้โปรยในงานรื่นเริง; ปอมปอมสำหรับตกแต่ง; เกมดื่มเหล้า; หลอดและที่คนเครื่องดื่ม; ที่ปิดซองจดหมาย; โปรแกรมกิจกรรม; พลุและประทัด; อุปกรณ์เป่าลมสำหรับงานปาร์ตี้; การ์ดเชิญ; เครื่องทำเสียงและที่เป่าสำหรับงานปาร์ตี้; ของขวัญงานปาร์ตี้; เกมสำหรับงานปาร์ตี้; หมวกสำหรับงานปาร์ตี้; สายรุ้งและม่านประดับ; ชุดอุปกรณ์สำหรับปาร์ตี้; ปินยาตา; ที่ตั้งการ์ด; การ์ดระบุที่นั่ง; การ์ดตอบกลับ; ไฟเย็น; กล่องและที่ใส่การ์ดสำหรับโอกาสพิเศษ; สเปรย์สายรุ้ง
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Zabava in praznovanje > Pripomočki za zabave: Voščilnice z nasveti; Kompleti balonov; Baloni; Zastavice; Rojstnodnevne svečke; Okrasni trakovi za stole; Okraski za koktajle; Konfeti; Okrasni navijaški cofi; Pivske igre; Slamice za pitje in mešalniki; Okrasne nalepke za kuverte; Programi dogodkov; Ognjemeti in petarde; Napihljivi okraski za zabave; Vabila; Izdelki za ustvarjanje hrupa in piščalke za zabave; Spominki za zabave; Igre za zabave; Kape za zabave; Okrasni trakovi in zavese za zabave; Kompleti za zabave; Pinjate; Držala za kartice za sedežni red; Kartice za sedežni red; Kartice za odziv; Prskalice; Škatle in držala za voščilnice za posebne priložnosti; Trakovi v spreju
fi: Taide ja viihde > Juhlat > Juhlatarvikkeet: Ohjekortit; Ilmapallopaketit; Ilmapallot; Bannerit; Syntymäpäiväkynttilät; Tuolinpäälliset; Cocktailkoristeet; Konfetti; Koristetupsut; Juomapelit; Pillit ja drinkkitikut; Kirjesinetit; Tapahtumaohjelmat; Ilotulitteet ja papatit; Ilmatäytteiset juhlakoristeet; Kutsut; Torvet ja juhlapillit; Osallistujalahjat; Juhlapelit; Juhlahatut; Serpentiinit ja juhlaverhot; Juhlatarvikepakkaukset; Piñatat; Paikkakortinpidikkeet; Paikkakortit; Vastauskortit; Tähtisadetikut; Onnittelukorttilaatikot ja -pidikkeet; Sprayserpentiini
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Vakarėliai ir šventės > Vakarėlių reikmenys: Patarimų kortelės; Balionų rinkiniai; Balionai; Vėliavėlės; Gimtadienio žvakutės; Kaspinai kėdėms; Kokteilių papuošimai; Konfeti; Dekoratyviniai bumbulai; Gėrimo žaidimai; Gėrimo šiaudeliai ir maišyklės; Vokų antspaudai; Renginių programos; Fejerverkai ir petardos; Pripučiamos vakarėlių dekoracijos; Kvietimai; Garsą skleidžiantys vakarėlių žaislai ir popierinės dūdelės; Dovanėlės svečiams; Vakarėlių žaidimai; Šventinės kepurės; Serpantinų juostos ir užuolaidos; Vakarėlio reikmenų rinkiniai; Pinjatos; Vietos kortelių laikikliai; Vietos kortelės; Atsakymų kortelės; Kibirkščiuojančios žvakės; Kortelių dėžutės ir laikikliai ypatingoms progoms; Purškiami siūlai
cs: Umění a zábava > Párty a oslavy > Potřeby pro párty: Přáníčka; Sady pro nafukování balónků; Balónky; Transparenty; Dortové svíčky; Slavnostní potahy na židle; Koktejlové dekorace; Konfety; Papírové koule, pom poms; Alkoholické hry; Brčka a míchadla; Pečeti na obálky; Programy oslav a události; Ohňostroje a petardy; Nafukovací dekorace na párty; Pozvánky; Klaksony a frkačky; Dárečky pro hosty; Hry na večírky; Čepičky na oslavy; Girlandy a party závěsy; Sady party materiálu; Piňaty; Stojánky na jmenovky; Jmenovky na stůl; Odpovědní karty; Prskavky; Krabice a držáky na přání; Konfety ve spreji
it: Arte e svago > Party e festeggiamenti > Articoli per la festa: Biglietti per consigli; Kit di palloncini; Palloncini; Striscioni; Candeline; Addobbi per sedie; Decorazioni per cocktail; Coriandoli; Pon-pon decorativi; Giochi alcolici; Cannucce e mescolatori; Sigilli per buste; Programmi di eventi; Fuochi d'artificio e petardi; Decorazioni gonfiabili per feste; Inviti; Strumenti che fanno rumore/trombette; Tutto per la festa; Giochi per feste; Cappellini da festa; Tende a fili e stelle filanti; Kit di articoli per feste; Piñatas; Supporti segnaposto; Segnaposti; Biglietti di risposta; Scintilline; Contenitori per biglietti e portainviti; Stelle filanti spray
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Petreceri > Articole pentru petreceri: Cartonașe cu sfaturi; Seturi cu baloane; Baloane; Bannere; Lumânări aniversare; Panglici decorative pentru scaune; Ornamente cocteil; Confetti; Pompoane decorative; Jocuri de petrecere; Paie și palete de amestecat; Sigilii pentru plicuri; Programe evenimente; Artificii și petarde; Decorațiuni gonflabile pentru petreceri; Invitații; Suflante pentru petreceri; Mărturii petrecere; Jocuri pentru petreceri; Coifuri pentru petreceri; Draperii și perdele pentru petreceri; Seturi cu articole de petrecere; Piñata; Suporturi pentru cartonașe pentru loc; Cartonașe pentru loc; Cartonașe răspuns; Artificii; Cutii și suporturi pentru cartonașe pentru ocazii speciale; Decorațiuni spray
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Parti ve Kutlamalar > Parti Malzemeleri: Tavsiye Kartları; Balon Setleri; Balonlar; Pankartlar; Doğum Günü Mumları; Sandalye Kuşakları; Kokteyl Süsleri; Konfetiler; Dekoratif Ponponlar; İçki Masası Oyunları; İçecek Kamış ve Karıştırıcıları; Zarf Mühürleri; Etkinlik Programları; Havai Fişekler ve Maytaplar; Şişme Parti Dekorları; Davetiyeler; Parti Düdükleri; Parti Eşantiyonları; Parti Oyunları; Parti Şapkaları; Parti Flamaları ve Perdeleri; Parti Malzeme Setleri; Pinyatalar; Yer Kartı Kutuları; Yer Kartları; Kutlama Kartları; Maytaplar; Özel Etkinlik Davetiyesi Kutuları ve Kapları; İp Spreyleri
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 派對和節慶 > 派對用品: 婚禮賀卡; 汽球遊戲組; 氣球; 橫幅; 生日蠟燭; 椅背飾帶; 雞尾酒裝飾; 彩色紙屑; 裝飾花球; 飲酒遊戲; 吸管和攪拌棒; 信件蠟封章; 活動流程手冊; 煙火和鞭炮; 充氣派對裝飾; 邀請函; 發聲器/紙捲笛; 派對小物; 派對遊戲; 派對帽; 派對用鋁箔絲/門簾; 派對道具組; 皮納塔驚喜包; 桌牌架; 座位牌; 回函卡; 仙女棒; 特殊場合專用卡片盒; 噴彩罐
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Przyjęcia i świętowanie > Artykuły na przyjęcia: Kartki okolicznościowe z sentencją; Zestawy balonów; Balony; Banery; Świeczki urodzinowe; Dekoracje krzeseł; Dekoracje koktajlowe; Konfetti; Pompony ozdobne; Zabawy związane z piciem alkoholu; Słomki do picia i mieszadełka; Pieczęcie na koperty; Programy wydarzeń; Sztuczne ognie i petardy; Nadmuchiwane dekoracje okolicznościowe; Zaproszenia; Trąbki i piszczałki na przyjęcia; Upominki dla gości; Gry na przyjęcia; Kapelusze imprezowe; Serpentyny i zasłony; Zestawy akcesoriów na przyjęcia; Piniaty; Stojaki na winietki; Winietki; Kartki z odpowiedzią; Zimne ognie; Stojaki i pojemniki na kartki z życzeniami; Serpentyna w sprayu
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Fest og feiring > Festutstyr: Kort med råd; Ballongsett; Ballonger; Bannere; Fødselsdagslys; Stolsløyfer; Cocktaildekorasjoner; Konfetti; Dekorative pom-poms; Drikkeleker; Sugerør og rørepinner; Konvoluttsegl; Festprogrammer; Fyrverkeri og kinaputter; Oppblåsbare festdekorasjoner; Invitasjoner; Lydleker og festblåser; Festpresanger; Festleker; Festhatter; Serpentiner og forheng; Sett med festutstyr; Piñataer; Bordkortholdere; Bordkort; Svarkort; Stjerneskudd; Bokser og holdere til kort for spesielle anledninger; Spraytråd
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 聚会/庆典 > 聚会用品: 建议卡; 气球套装; 气球; 条幅; 生日蜡烛; 椅子套/饰带; 鸡尾酒装饰品; 五彩纸屑; 装饰花球; 酒桌游戏; 吸管与搅拌棒; 封缄票; 活动节目说明; 烟花爆竹; 充气聚会装饰; 请帖/请柬; 噪音发生器/聚会鼓风机; 派对伴手礼; 聚会游戏; 派对帽; 聚会彩带/雨丝门帘; 聚会用品套装; 皮纳塔/彩蛋; 席位卡托架; 席位卡; 回函卡; 烟花棒; 贺卡/问候卡展示收纳; 喷彩